Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 3. State Drinking Water Revolving Account

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

61C Am. Jur. 2d Pollution Control §§ 782 to 798.

39A C.J.S. Health and Environment §§ 106 to 114, 129, 131.

§ 16-1-301.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Account” means the state drinking revolving loan account created by W.S.

16-1-302

;

“Administrative account” means the account which may receive up to four percent (4%) of the federal capitalization funds, loan administration and loan application fees which are used to reimburse costs incurred by state agencies in the administration of the program, including but not limited to costs of servicing loans and issuing debt, program start-up costs, financial, management, and legal consulting fees, and costs for support services by state agencies;

“Board” means the state loan and investment board to include the office of state lands and investments;

“Capitalization grant” means the federal grant made to Wyoming by the federal environmental protection agency for the purpose of establishing and funding a state drinking water revolving loan account;

“Capacity development” means that a community water system or nontransient noncommunity water system can adequately demonstrate that it has technical, managerial and financial capabilities to ensure current and future operations of the water system in accordance with all drinking water regulations in effect;

“Commission” means the Wyoming water development commission and includes the water development office;

“Community water system” means a public water supply which has at least fifteen (15) service connections used year-round by residents, or that regularly provides water to at least twenty-five (25) residents year-round, including, but not limited to, municipalities and water districts;

“Department” means the department of environmental quality;

“Noncommunity water system” means a public water supply which is not a community water system, including, but not limited to, public schools, state park recreational areas and state highway public rest areas;

“Nontransient noncommunity water system” means a public water supply which is not a community system and which regularly provides service to at least twenty-five (25) of the same persons for more than six (6) months of the year who are not full-time residents, including, but not limited to, factories, industrial facilities and office buildings;

“Office of state lands and investments (OSLI)” means the office which provides administrative and operational management of programs of the state loan and investment board;

“Operator” means the person who is directly responsible and in charge of the operation of a water treatment plant or water distribution system;

“Private” means that pertaining to an individual, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity which is not a political subdivision of the state, county or local government;

“Program” means the drinking water state revolving fund program pursuant to section 1452 of the Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. § 300j-12);

“Publicly owned water system” means a water system which is owned, operated, managed and maintained by an entity of the state, county, city, township, town, school district, water district, improvement district, joint powers board or any other entity constituting a political subdivision under the laws of this state which provides water for use and consumption of the general public through pipes and other constructed conveyances, and which is not owned, operated, managed or maintained by a private individual, association or corporation;

“Safe Drinking Water Act (SDWA)” means the federal Safe Drinking Water Act including the 1996 amendments (Public Law 104-182, 42 U.S.C. § 300f et seq.);

“Source water assessment” means the delineation of the boundaries of an area from which one (1) or more public water supplies receive drinking water, identifying the existence of actual and potential contaminants which may present a threat to public health within the delineated area to determine the susceptibility of the public water supply in the delineated area to such contaminants;

“Water supply system” means a system from the water source to the consumer premises consisting of pipes, structures and facilities through which water is obtained, treated, stored, distributed or otherwise offered to the public for household use or use by humans and which is part of a community water system or a noncommunity water system;

“Wyoming water development office (WWDO)” means the office which provides administrative and operational management of the programs administered by the Wyoming water development commission;

“Corrective action account” means as defined by W.S. 35-11-1415(a)(ii).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 88, § 1; 2022 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (a)(xx).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

§ 16-1-302.
Account established; state match.

There is established the state drinking water revolving loan account. All monies received from the federal capitalization grants, excluding any set-aside authorized by the Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. § 300j-12), and all state matching funds shall be deposited in the account and shall only be used to provide financial assistance as authorized by this article.

The twenty percent (20%) state matching funds for each federal capitalization grant payment to the account may be paid fifty percent (50%) out of water development accounts I or II created by W.S. 41-2-124(a) and fifty percent (50%) from the federal mineral royalty capital construction account created by W.S.

9-4-604

, up to the maximum amount available and authorized from those accounts. If the available and authorized funds from the federal mineral royalty capital construction account and water development accounts I or II are together insufficient to provide the full twenty percent (20%) state match amount, the board may authorize additional matching funds to be paid from the corrective action account or loaned from the mineral royalty capital construction account created by W.S.

9-4-604

. Funding received from the corrective action account for state matching funds and any additional monies received from the mineral royalty capital construction account shall be reimbursed from eligible program funds to the account from which they were paid.

Any unexpended balance in the account shall be invested by the state treasurer and the investment proceeds, including the interest earned, shall be credited to the account.

A separate administrative account shall be established outside of the account for the purpose of paying administrative expenses associated with the program as authorized under the Safe Drinking Water Act. Revenue to this account shall be limited to four percent (4%) of the federal capitalization grant through federal fiscal year 2003 and five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) per biennium thereafter.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 88, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2022 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (a), substituted “excluding any” for “exclusive of the four percent (4%) administration,” deleted “as” following “set-aside,” substituted “by” for “under section 1452(a) of”; in (b), in the first sentence, substituted “may” for “shall,” added “, up to the maximum amount available and authorized from those accounts,” and added the second and third sentences.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 2, subsection 60, effective July 1, 2004, appropriates $1,944,000 from the general fund to the federal mineral royalty capital construction account created by W.S.

9-4-604

for purposes of funding 50% of the state match for the federal safe drinking water revolving loan fund program pursuant to W.S. 16-1-302(b).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 16-1-303.
Account administration; board powers and duties; department powers and duties; water development office powers and duties; fiscal procedures.

The board, the department and commission are designated as the implementing and administrative agencies for the drinking water state revolving account and shall jointly develop a memorandum of understanding describing the duties and responsibilities of each agency.

The board, subject to select water committee review and recommendation of projects, shall administer the account including issuing loans and other forms of financial assistance for purposes authorized in this article on the basis of a priority listing of eligible projects. The board shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations necessary to administer the account within the requirements of this article, the Safe Drinking Water Act and other federal and state laws, including the content of applications, priority listing for use of funds in accordance with requirements established in section 1452(b)(3) of the Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. § 300j-12(b)), criteria for awarding, security, and terms and conditions for making loans and providing financial assistance.

The office of state lands and investments shall:

Enter into an agreement with the federal environmental protection agency regional administrator to receive capitalization grants for the account;

Receive, review and make recommendations to the board and the select water committee for approval of applications for financial assistance from the account in accordance with requirements established by the board for publicly owned water systems of municipalities, counties, joint powers boards, state agencies, and other entities constituting a political subdivision under the laws of the state on forms supplied by the office of state lands and investments;

Administer the account and administrative account including processing and receiving capitalization grants, the state match, financial assistance agreements, repayments on all financial assistance and all other account revenues;

Conduct and allow the federal environmental protection agency to conduct an annual audit;

Ensure that all publicly owned water systems which are recipients of financial assistance from the account demonstrate capacity development capabilities in compliance with section 1420 of the Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. § 300g-9). The department and the water development office shall assist the office of state lands and investments by reviewing and making determinations on the adequacy of water system capacity development capabilities; and

Following public input and recommendations from the water development office and department and upon review and recommendation of the intended use plan and the project priority list by the select water committee, the state loan and investment board shall give final authorization and adoption of the annual intended use plans and the final priority listing of eligible projects.

The board, as a condition to making a loan or other financial assistance, may impose a reasonable administrative fee or application fee that may be paid from the proceeds of the loan or financial assistance or other available funds of the applicant. These fees may be deposited into the administrative account for purposes of payment of administrative costs of the program.

The department shall:

Assist the office of state lands and investment and the commission annually with the preparation and submission to the federal environmental protection agency an intended use plan and the priority listing of projects eligible to receive assistance from the account which have been subject to public comment and which identifies the intended uses of monies available to the account;

Assist in the preparation and submission of a biennial report required by the Safe Drinking Water Act;

Assist with the preparation and submission of capitalization grant applications;

Provide input and assistance in the evaluations on capacity development for water systems in accordance with procedures adopted pursuant to this article;

Provide operator certification and technical competency for water systems in accordance with W.S. 35-11-302(a)(iv) to include all applicants for financial assistance from the program; and

Ensure that all new or modified community water systems and new or modified nontransient noncommunity water systems commencing operation after October 1, 1999, demonstrate capacity development capabilities and by October 1, 2001, develop a strategy to assist all community and noncommunity water systems in acquiring and maintaining capacity development by adopting procedures governing capacity development in compliance with section 1420 of the Safe Drinking Water Act (42 U.S.C. § 300g-9). The department shall adopt procedures to accomplish this task and shall have the authority to require new systems in noncompliance of capacity development capabilities to take steps to correct inadequacies or cease water system operations. The water development office shall assist the department in the review and adequacy determinations of water system capacity development capabilities.

The commission shall:

Evaluate engineering designs and studies and provide the technical and administrative management of contracts for all projects in accordance with requirements of this article, state program, and the Safe Drinking Water Act;

Assist the office of state lands and investments and the department annually with the preparation and submission to the federal environmental protection agency an intended use plan and the priority listing of projects eligible to receive assistance from the account which have been subject to public comment and which identifies the intended uses of monies available to the account;

Provide input and assistance in the evaluations of capacity development for water systems in accordance with procedures developed as authorized by this article; and

Include in the commission’s annual report to the legislature, a report on the status of the drinking water state revolving loan fund.

The office of state lands and investments and all recipients of financial assistance from the account shall establish fiscal controls and accounting procedures in compliance with the Safe Drinking Water Act.

The office of state lands and investments shall require as part of the application and approval process, that all financial assistance applicants obtain or ensure the certification of the operators of the publicly owned water systems in accordance with department rules and regulations prior to obtaining financial assistance approval.

The select water committee shall review and recommend for approval project applications submitted to the committee pursuant to subsection (c)(ii) of this section.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 88, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

§ 16-1-304.
Environmental review process.

The department shall conduct and make available to the office of state lands and investments a review of potential environmental impacts of projects receiving assistance from the account. The environmental review process shall:

Contain mechanisms requiring implementation of mitigation measures to ensure the project is environmentally sound;

Allow the public an opportunity to challenge environmental review determinations and enforcement actions;

Employ an interdisciplinary approach to identify and mitigate adverse environmental effects including all pertinent state and federal authorities;

Include documentation of information, processes and premises that influence decisions;

Require public notice and participation;

Include evaluation criteria and a process allowing consideration of alternative decisions; and

Comply with the requirements of the Safe Drinking Water Act.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 88, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

§ 16-1-305.
Authorized projects; authorized financial assistance.

Subject to select water committee review and recommendation of projects, the account may be used for financial assistance for the planning, design and construction of projects on eligible publicly owned water systems which may be either community or noncommunity water systems. Eligible projects may be comprised of improvements to all components of a water supply system as appropriate and permitted by the Safe Drinking Water Act.

Financial assistance for the projects authorized in subsection (a) of this section may be in the forms authorized by the Safe Drinking Water Act including:

Loans at or below market interest rates. Loans may be awarded only if:

All principal and interest payments on loans are credited directly to the account;

The annual repayment of principal and payment of interest begins not later than one (1) year after project completion;

The loan is fully amortized not later than thirty (30) years after project completion or not later than forty (40) years for disadvantaged communities providing the period of the loan does not exceed the design life of the project; and

Each loan recipient establishes a dedicated source of revenue for repayment of the loan.

Refinancing existing debt obligation of publicly owned water systems for planning, design and construction of water systems for which the initial debt was incurred and construction started after July 1, 1993;

Purchasing insurance for or guaranteeing local debt obligations to improve credit market access or reduce interest rates;

Grants and other forms of financial assistance.

An amount up to four percent (4%) of the capitalization grant may be used for costs of administering the account and shall be deposited into the administrative account.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 69, § 204.

The board may consider the use of an amount of the allowable percentage of the capitalization grant for all of the established set-asides provided for by the Safe Drinking Water Act.

The board may authorize the use of any amount of the allowable percentage of the capitalization grant for any set-aside authorized by the Safe Drinking Water Act.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 88, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, §§ 203, 204; 2022 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (e), deleted the former first sentence which read: “Funding set-asides and loan subsidies as allowed by the
Safe Drinking Water Act for federal fiscal years 1997, 1998 and 1999 shall be limited to those provided for in subsections (c) and (d) of this section,” and deleted “in all following federal fiscal years starting in the year 2000” at the end; and repealed former (d) which read: “An amount up to 10 percent (10%) of the federal fiscal year 1997 capitalization grant may be set-aside and delineated to be used to do statewide source water assessment activities as provided by this article.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (b)(i)(C), substituted “thirty (30)” for “twenty (20)” and “forty (40)” for “thirty (30)”; added (b)(iv); and added (f).

§ 16-1-306.
Inventory of publicly owned water systems; sanitary surveys.

The department and water development office shall maintain an inventory of publicly owned water systems within the state, which inventory may consist of such information as the department and water development office deem necessary to include information as provided by the environmental protection agency.

The department and water development office shall conduct sanitary surveys of community and nontransient noncommunity water systems within the state. The sanitary surveys shall be conducted no less than every five (5) years and information contained in the surveys shall be used in establishing the priority ranking list for eligible projects as part of this program.

The costs incurred by the department and water development office to maintain the inventory of publicly owned water systems and to conduct sanitary surveys may be reimbursed to the agencies from the administrative account.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 88, § 1.

§ 16-1-307.
Transfer of funds.

The governor may transfer capitalization grant funds from the water pollution control revolving loan account established by W.S.

16-1-202

to the drinking water state revolving fund account created by W.S.

16-1-302

and from the drinking water state revolving fund account to the water pollution control revolving loan account, as authorized by the Safe Drinking Water Act.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 88, § 1.

§ 16-1-308.
Emergency financial assistance.

Notwithstanding any provision of W.S. 16-1-303(b) or (j) or 16-1-305(a), the board may, without further select water committee review and recommendation, authorize loans or other forms of financial assistance from the account for purposes authorized in this article, if the board determines:

An emergency exists which significantly threatens the continued operation of a public water system; and

There is insufficient time to obtain select water committee review and recommendation of the project in order to effectively address the emergency situation.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 88, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed act.